Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.230

Payroll deductions authorized.

Any official of the state authorized to disburse funds in payment of salaries and wages of public officers or employees is authorized, upon written request of the officer or employee, to deduct from the salaries or wages of the officers or employees, the amount or amounts of subscription payments, premiums, contributions, or continuation thereof, for payment of the following:

(1) Credit union deductions: PROVIDED, That twenty-five or more employees of a single state agency or a total of one hundred or more state employees of several agencies have authorized such a deduction for payment to the same credit union. An agency may, in its own discretion, establish a minimum participation requirement of fewer than twenty-five employees.

(2) Parking fee deductions: PROVIDED, That payment is made for parking facilities furnished by the agency or by the department of enterprise services. Deductions shall be pretax, to the extent possible, for qualified parking and transit benefits as allowed under the federal internal revenue code.

(3) U.S. savings bond deductions: PROVIDED, That a person within the particular agency shall be appointed to act as trustee. The trustee will receive all contributions; purchase and deliver all bond certificates; and keep such records and furnish such bond or security as will render full accountability for all bond contributions.

(4) Board, lodging or uniform deductions when such board, lodging and uniforms are furnished by the state, or deductions for academic tuitions or fees or scholarship contributions payable to the employing institution.

(5) Dues and other fees deductions: PROVIDED, That the deduction is for payment of membership dues to any professional organization formed primarily for public employees or college and university professors: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That twenty-five or more employees of a single state agency, or a total of one hundred or more state employees of several agencies have authorized such a deduction for payment to the same professional organization.

(6) Labor, employee, or retiree organization dues, and voluntary employee contributions to any funds, committees, or subsidiary organizations maintained by labor, employee, or retiree organizations, may be deducted in the event that a payroll deduction is not provided under a collective bargaining agreement under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW: PROVIDED, That each labor, employee, or retiree organization chooses only one fund for voluntary employee contributions: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That twenty-five or more officers or employees of a single agency, or a total of one hundred or more officers or employees of several agencies have authorized such a deduction for payment to the same labor, employee, or retiree organization: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That labor, employee, or retiree organizations with five hundred or more members in state government may have payroll deduction for employee benefit programs.

(7) Insurance contributions to the authority for payment of premiums under contracts authorized by the state health care authority. However, enrollment or assignment by the state health care authority to participate in a health care benefit plan, as required by RCW 41.05.065(8), shall authorize a payroll deduction of premium contributions without a written consent under the terms and conditions established by the public employees' benefits board.

(8) Deductions to a bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association if (a) the bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association is authorized to do business in this state; and (b) twenty-five or more employees of a single agency, or fewer, if a lesser number is established by such agency, or a total of one hundred or more state employees of several agencies have authorized a deduction for payment to the same bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association.

Deductions from salaries and wages of public officers and employees other than those enumerated in this section or by other law, may be authorized by the director of financial management for purposes clearly related to state employment or goals and objectives of the agency and for plans authorized by the state health care authority.

(9) Contributions to the Washington state combined fund drive.

The authority to make deductions from the salaries and wages of public officers and employees as provided for in this section shall be in addition to such other authority as may be provided by law: PROVIDED, That the state or any department, division, or separate agency of the state shall not be liable to any insurance carrier or contractor for the failure to make or transmit any such deduction.

[ 2013 c 124 s 1; 2007 c 99 s 1; 2006 c 216 s 1; 2002 c 61 s 5; 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 21. Prior: 1993 c 2 s 26 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992); 1992 c 192 s 1; 1988 c 107 s 19; 1985 c 271 s 1; 1983 1st ex.s. c 28 s 3; 1980 c 120 s 1; 1979 c 151 s 54; 1973 1st ex.s. c 147 s 5; 1970 ex.s. c 39 s 11; 1969 c 59 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 216: "This act takes effect January 1, 2007." [ 2006 c 216 s 2.]

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 28A.400.410.

Implementation—Effective dates—1988 c 107: See RCW 41.05.901.

Application—1983 1st ex.s. c 28: See note following RCW 42.16.010.

Effective date—Effect of veto—Savings—Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 147: See notes following RCW 41.05.050.

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 39: See note following RCW 41.05.050.